test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - A - mshkimot :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mshkimot+NI: mshkimod
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mshkimot+NI: nmashkmod
     2+mshkimot+NI: gmashkmod
     3+mshkimot+NI: mashkmod
     X+mshkimot+NI: mashkmod
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mshkimot+NI+Con: mshkimdenh
     mshkimot+NI+Dim: mshkimdens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mshkimot+NI+Pej: mshkimdaash
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mshkimot+NI+Prt: mshkimdaaba
     mshkimot+NI+Voc+Pl: mshkimdaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mshkimot+NI+4: mshkimdan
     mshkimot+NI+Loc: mshkimdaang
     mshkimot+NI+Pl: mshkimdan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con: nmashkmodenh
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim: nmashkmodens
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con: gmashkmodenh
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim: gmashkmodens
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con: mashkmodenh
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim: mashkmodens
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con: mashkmodenh
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim: mashkmodens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos: nmashkmodaam
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos: gmashkmodaam
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos: mashkmodaam
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos: mashkmodaam
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej: nmashkmodaash
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej: gmashkmodaash
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej: mashkmodaash
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pej: mashkmodaash
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl: nmashkmodaanaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl: gmashkmodaanaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl: gmashkmodaawaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl: mashkmodaawaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+3+4: mashkmodaani
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Prt: nmashkmodaaba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodaadig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Prt: gmashkmodaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Prt: mashkmodaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaadig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Prt: mashkmodaaba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+4: nmashkmodan
     1+mshkimot+NI+Loc: nmashkmodaang
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pl: nmashkmodan
     2+mshkimot+NI+4: gmashkmodan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Loc: gmashkmodaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pl: gmashkmodan
     3+mshkimot+NI+4: mashkmodan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Loc: mashkmodaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pl: mashkmodan
     X+mshkimot+NI+4: mashkmodan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Loc: mashkmodaang
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pl: mashkmodan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej: mshkimdenyish
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej: mshkimdensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt: mshkimdenyba
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mshkimdenydig
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt: mshkimdensba
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mshkimdensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mshkimot+NI+Con+4: mshkimdenyin
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Loc: mshkimdenying
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pl: mshkimdenyin
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+4: mshkimdensan
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Loc: mshkimdensing
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pl: mshkimdensan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt: mshkimdaashba
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mshkimdaashdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+4: mshkimdaashan
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Loc: mshkimdaashing
     mshkimot+NI+Pej+Pl: mshkimdaashan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mshkimot+NI+Prt+4: mshkimdaabniin
     mshkimot+NI+Prt+Loc: mshkimdaabniing
     mshkimot+NI+Prt+Pl: mshkimdaabniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos: nmashkmodenyim
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos: nmashkmodensim
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos: gmashkmodenyim
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos: gmashkmodensim
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos: mashkmodenyim
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos: mashkmodensim
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos: mashkmodenyim
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos: mashkmodensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej: nmashkmodenyish
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej: nmashkmodensish
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej: gmashkmodenyish
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej: gmashkmodensish
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej: mashkmodenyish
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej: mashkmodensish
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej: mashkmodenyish
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej: mashkmodensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl: nmashkmodenynaa
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nmashkmodensnaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl: gmashkmodenynaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl: gmashkmodenywaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gmashkmodensnaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl: gmashkmodenswaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl: mashkmodenywaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4: mashkmodenyni
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl: mashkmodenswaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4: mashkmodensni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt: nmashkmodenyba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodenydig
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt: nmashkmodensba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodensdig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt: gmashkmodenyba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenydig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt: gmashkmodensba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensdig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt: mashkmodenyba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenydig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt: mashkmodensba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensdig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Prt: mashkmodenyba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenydig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Prt: mashkmodensba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+4: nmashkmodenyin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Loc: nmashkmodenying
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pl: nmashkmodenyin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+4: nmashkmodensan
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Loc: nmashkmodensing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pl: nmashkmodensan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+4: gmashkmodenyin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Loc: gmashkmodenying
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pl: gmashkmodenyin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+4: gmashkmodensan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Loc: gmashkmodensing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pl: gmashkmodensan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+4: mashkmodenyin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Loc: mashkmodenying
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pl: mashkmodenyin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+4: mashkmodensan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Loc: mashkmodensing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pl: mashkmodensan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+4: mashkmodenyin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Loc: mashkmodenying
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pl: mashkmodenyin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+4: mashkmodensan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Loc: mashkmodensing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pl: mashkmodensan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej: nmashkmodaamish
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej: gmashkmodaamish
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej: mashkmodaamish
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej: mashkmodaamish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmashkmodaamnaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmashkmodaamnaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmashkmodaamwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: mashkmodaamwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+3+4: mashkmodaamni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Prt: nmashkmodaamba
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodaamdig
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Prt: gmashkmodaamba
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaamdig
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Prt: mashkmodaamba
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaamdig
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Prt: mashkmodaamba
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaamdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+4: nmashkmodaaman
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Loc: nmashkmodaaming
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pl: nmashkmodaaman
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+4: gmashkmodaaman
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Loc: gmashkmodaaming
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pl: gmashkmodaaman
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+4: mashkmodaaman
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Loc: mashkmodaaming
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pl: mashkmodaaman
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+4: mashkmodaaman
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Loc: mashkmodaaming
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pl: mashkmodaaman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nmashkmodaashnaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gmashkmodaashnaa
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl: gmashkmodaashwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl: mashkmodaashwaa
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+3+4: mashkmodaashni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt: nmashkmodaashba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodaashdig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt: gmashkmodaashba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaashdig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt: mashkmodaashba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaashdig
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Prt: mashkmodaashba
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaashdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+4: nmashkmodaashan
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Loc: nmashkmodaashing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Pl: nmashkmodaashan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+4: gmashkmodaashan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Loc: gmashkmodaashing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Pl: gmashkmodaashan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+4: mashkmodaashan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Loc: mashkmodaashing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Pl: mashkmodaashan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pej+4: mashkmodaashan
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Loc: mashkmodaashing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Pej+Pl: mashkmodaashan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodaanaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodaanaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodaanaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaanaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodaawaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaawaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodaawaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaawaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+3+4+Prt: mashkmodaanwiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaanwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodaanaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodaanaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodaanaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodaanaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodaanaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodaanaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodaawaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodaawaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodaawaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+4: mashkmodaawaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodaawaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodaawaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+3+4+4: mashkmodaanwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+3+4+Loc: mashkmodaaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+3+4+Pl: mashkmodaanwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Prt+4: nmashkmodaabniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodaabniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Prt+4: gmashkmodaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Prt+4: mashkmodaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaabniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Prt+4: mashkmodaabniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaabniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaabniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: mshkimdenyshiba
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mshkimdenyshidig
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: mshkimdensshiba
     mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mshkimdensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+4: mshkimdenyshan
